Utah, session 2026, HB173.
Section 1. Section 41-1a-414 is amended to read:41-1a-414. Parking privileges for individuals with disabilities and expectant mothers.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Accessible parking space" means a parking space that: (i)is clearly identified as reserved for use by a person an individual with a disability and includes:(i)(A)vertical signage, including the international symbol of accessibility, that is visible from a passing vehicle; and(ii)(B)a clearly marked access aisle, if provided, that is adjacent to and considered part of the parking space.; and(ii)an individual with a disability or an expectant mother may use for parking, in accordance with the requirements of this part.(b)"Expectant mother" means an individual who is pregnant, as confirmed by a physician.(c)"Expectant mother parking placard" means a temporary removable windshield placard that includes, conspicuously displayed:(i)the expiration date of the placard; and(ii)the following statement, in bold, "An expectant mother parking placard may be issued only to an expectant mother and is valid for up to one year after the date of issuance."(d)"Physician" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-1a-420.(e)(i)"Removable windshield placard" means a placard that is removable and meant to be displayed on, or visible from, the windshield of a vehicle.(ii)"Removable windshield placard" includes:(A)an expectant mother parking placard;(B)a temporary removable windshield placard;(C)a temporary wheelchair user placard; and(D)a wheelchair user placard.(f)"Temporary removable windshield placard" means a removable windshield placard with an expiration date.(b)(g)"Temporary wheelchair user placard" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-1a-420.(c)(h)"Van accessible parking space" means an accessible parking space that is marked for use by a qualifying person individual with a walking disability who has a temporary wheelchair user placard or a wheelchair user placard and includes:(i)vertical signage with the international symbol of accessibility and the words "van accessible" that is visible from a passing vehicle; and(ii)a clearly marked access aisle that is adjacent to and considered part of the parking space.(d)(i)"Walking disability" means a physical disability that requires the use of a walking-assistive device or wheelchair or similar low-powered motorized or mechanically propelled vehicle that is specifically designed to assist a person an individual who has a limited or impaired ability to walk.(e)(j)"Wheelchair user placard" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-1a-420.(2)Except in parking areas designated for emergency use, a personan individual with a disability, qualifying under rules made in accordance with Section 41-1a-420, may park an appropriately marked vehicle for reasonable periods without charge in metered parking zones and restricted parking areas, in a manner that allows proper access to the vehicle by the person individual with a disability.(3)(a)The division shall create an expectant mother parking placard.(b)The division shall provide for the design, size, color, and placement of the expectant mother parking placard described in Subsection (3)(a).(4)The division shall issue an expectant mother parking placard to an applicant who:(a)is an expectant mother;(b)completes an application as required under this section; and(c)pays a $15 application fee.(5)The division shall deposit the application fee described in Subsection (4)(c) into the License Plate Restricted Account described in Section 41-1a-122.(6)An application for an expectant mother parking placard shall include:(a)a certification by a physician that the applicant is an expectant mother;(b)the certifying physician's name and address; and(c)the signatures of:(i)the certifying physician; and(ii)the applicant.(3)(a)Only those vehicles carrying a person with a disability special group license plate, temporary removable windshield placard, or removable windshield placard and transporting a qualifying person with a disability may park in an accessible parking space.(b)A violation of Subsection (3)(a) is a class C misdemeanor.(c)A person described in Subsection (3)(a) is encouraged to avoid parking in a van accessible parking space unless:(i)the person has a walking disability and has a temporary wheelchair user placard;(ii)the person has a wheelchair user placard; or(iii)all other accessible parking spaces that are not van accessible parking spaces are occupied.(7)(a)A vehicle may park in an accessible parking space if:(i)the vehicle displays:(A)a disability special group license plate;(B)a temporary removable windshield placard; or(C)a removable windshield placard; and(ii)the vehicle is transporting a qualifying individual with a disability or an expectant mother.(b)An individual who violates Subsection (7)(a) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.(c)An individual parking a vehicle described in Subsection (7)(a) is encouraged to avoid parking in a van accessible parking space unless:(i)the individual has a walking disability and has a temporary wheelchair user placard;(ii)the individual has a wheelchair user placard; or(iii)all other accessible parking spaces that are not van accessible parking spaces are occupied.(4)(8)This section applies to and may be enforced on public property and on private property that is used or intended for use by the public.(5)(9)The parking privileges granted by this section also apply to vehicles displaying a person with a: (a)disability special group license plate,; (b)temporary removable windshield placard described in this section,; or (c)removable windshield placard issued by another jurisdiction if displayed on a vehicle being used by a person an individual with a disability.(6)(10)In addition to required accessible parking spaces, a person may provide and designate parking spaces for veterans and service members, including those with a disability.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 41-6a-217 is amended to read:41-6a-217. Volunteers may be authorized to enforce certain parking provisions.(1)Any A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws in this state may appoint volunteers to issue citations for violations of:(a)the provisions of Subsections 41-1a-414(3) and (4) 41-1a-414(7) and (8) related to parking for a person an individual with a disability;(b)any a municipal or county accessible parking privileges ordinance for a person an individual with a disability; or(c)the provisions of Subsection 41-6a-1307(4) related to parking in a school bus parking zone.(2)A volunteer appointed under this section must be at least 21 years of ageold.(3)The law enforcement agency appointing a volunteer may establish any other qualification for the volunteer that the agency finds desirable.(4)A volunteer may not issue citations until the volunteer has received training from the appointing law enforcement agency.(5)A citation issued by a volunteer under this section has the same force and effect as a citation issued by a peace officer for the same offense.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.